North Carolina, session 2025, SB393.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 115C-81.65 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-81.65. Financial literacy.
(a) Instruction shall be provided in personal financial literacy for all students. In addition
to the requirements in subsection (b) of this section, the State Board of Education shall determine
the other components of personal financial literacy that will be covered in the curriculum.
(b) Each student shall receive personal financial literacy instruction that shall include:
(1) The true cost of credit.
(2) Choosing and managing a credit card.
(3) Borrowing money for an automobile or other large purchase.
(4) Home mortgages.
(5) Credit scoring and credit reports.
(5a) The costs of gambling, including sports betting and gambling addiction.
(6) Other relevant financial literacy issues.
…."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
*S393-v-1*